Missouri, session 2026, SB975.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 190.050, 190.051, 190.052, 190.070,
2
190.090, and 590.192, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections
3
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 190.050,
4
190.051, 190.052, 190.070, 190.089, 190.090, and 590.192, to
5
read as follows:
1
190.050. 1. After the ambulance district has been
2
declared orga n ize d , the declaring county commission[, except
3
in counties of the second class having more than one hundred
4
five thousand inhabitants located adjacent to a county of
5
the first class having a charter form of government which
6
has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants,]
7
shall divide the district into six election districts as
8
equal in population as possible[, and] or provide for the
9
election of six directors elected at large from within the
10
district.
11
(1) If the county commission divides the district into
12
election districts, the commission shall by lot number the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

CCS HCS SS SB 975 2
13
districts from one to six inclusive. The county commission
14
shall cause an election to be held i n the ambulance district
15
[within ninety days] on the next regularly scheduled
16
election date after the order establishing the ambulance
17
district to elect ambulance district directors. Each voter
18
shall vote for one director from the ambulance e lection
19
district in which the voter resides. The directors elected
20
from districts one and four shall se r ve for a term of one
21
year, the directors elected from districts two and five
22
shall serve for a term of two years, and the directors from
23
districts three and six shall serve for a term of three
24
years; thereafter, the terms of all directors shall be three
25
years. All directors shall serve the term to which they
26
were e l ected or appointed, and until their successors are
27
elected and qualified, except in cases of resignation or
28
disqualification. The county commission shall reapportion
29
the ambulance dist ricts within sixty days after the
30
population of the county is reported to the governor for
31
each decennial census of the United States. Notwithstanding
32
any other provision of law, if the number o f candidates for
33
the office of director is no greater than the number of
34
directors to be elected, no election shall be held, and the
35
candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their
36
offices at the same time and in the same manner as if they
37
have been elected.
38
[2. In all counties of the second class having more
39
than one hundred five thousand inhabitants located adjacent
40
to a county of the first class having a charter form of
41
government which has a population of over nine hundred
42
thousand inhabitants,] (2) If the county commission
43
provides for an at-large bo ard of directors, it shall order
44
an election be held on the next regularly scheduled election

CCS HCS SS SB 975 3
45
date and the voters shall vote for six directors elected at
46
large from within the district for a term of three years.
47
[Those directors holding office in any district in such a
48
county on August 13, 1976, shall continue to hold office
49
until the expiration of their terms, and their successors
50
shall be elected from the district at large for a term of
51
three years. In any district formed in such counties after
52
August 13, 1 9 76, the governing body of the county shall
53
cause an election to be held in that district within ninety
54
days after the order establishing the ambulance district to
55
elect ambulance district directors. Each voter shall vote
56
for six directors.] The two candida t es receiving the
57
highest number of v o tes at such election shall be elected
58
for a term of three years, the two candidates receiving the
59
third and fourth highest number of votes shall be elected
60
for a term of two years, the two candidates receiving the
61
fifth and sixth highest number of votes shall be elected for
62
a term of one year; thereafter, the term of all directors
63
shall be three years. A director holding office as of
64
August 28, 2026, shall continue as an at-large director for
65
the remainder of such director's existing term.
66
[3.] 2. A candidate for director of the ambulance
67
district sha l l, at the time of filing, be a citizen of the
68
United States, [a qualified voter of the election district
69
as provided in subsection 1 of this section,] a resident of
70
the district for two years next preceding the election, and
71
shall be at least twenty-four years of age. In an
72
established district which is located withi n the
73
jurisdiction of more than one election authority, the
74
candidate shall file his or her declaration of candidacy
75
with the secretary of the board. In all other districts, a
76
candidate shall file a declarati o n of candidacy with the

CCS HCS SS SB 975 4
77
county clerk of the county in which he or she resides. A
78
candidate shall file a statement under oath that he or she
79
possesses the required qualifications. No candidate's name
80
shall be printed on any official ballo t unless the candidate
81
has filed a written declaration of candidacy pursuant to
82
subsection 5 of section 115.127. If the time between the
83
county commission's call for a s p ecial election and the date
84
of the election is not sufficient to allow compliance with
85
subsection 5 of section 115.127, the county commission
86
shall, at the time it calls the special election, set the
87
closing date for filing declarations of candidacy.
88
3. An ambulance district may, following a public
89
hearing subject to the provisions of chapter 610, by an
90
ordinance adopted by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of
91
the members of the board of directors, abolish the
92
boundaries of any existing election subdistricts if the
93
board is unable to find a qualified candidate to fill the
94
director position of each such subdistrict. Such ordinance
95
may eliminate the subdistricts entirely and provide for the
96
election of directors at large. A copy of the ordinance
97
shall be filed with the county c lerk. Upon the abolition of
98
such election subdistricts, all curre n t directors shall
99
serve as directors at large for the remainder of their
100
existing terms.
101
4. Any ambulance district may, by an ordinance adopted
102
by an a f firmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the
103
board of directors, establish election subdistricts. Each
104
election subdistrict shall consist of contiguous ter r itory
105
and shall be as compact and nearly equal in population as
106
practicable. The boundaries of such subdistricts shall be
107
established b y the county commission. Each board member
108
shall be a resident of the election s u bdistrict that he or

CCS HCS SS SB 975 5
109
she represents at the time of election and shall remain a
110
resident of such subdistrict for the duration of the
111
member's term.
112
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
113
contrar y , if the number of candidates for the office of
114
director is no greater than the number of directors to be
115
elected, no election shall be held, and the candidates shall
116
assume the responsibilities of their offices at the same
117
time and in the same manner as if they were elected.
1
190.051. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of
2
sections 190. 0 50 a nd 190.052 to the contrary, upon a
3
[motion] resolution adopted by the board of directors in
4
districts where there are six-member boards, and upon
5
approval by the voters in the district, the number of
6
directors may be increased to seven [with one board member
7
running district wide,] or decreased to five or three board
8
members. The resolution shall state the names of the
9
existing directors who will fill the positions on the board
10
if such measure is approved by the voters, as well as any
11
vacancies to be filled by subsequent election, and shall
12
state the dates on which those terms shall conclude.
13
2. The ballot to be used for the approval of the
14
voters t o increase or decrease the number of members on the
15
board of directors of the ambulance district shall be
16
substantially in the following form:
17
Shall the number of members of the board of
18
directors of the ______ (Insert name of district)
19
Ambulance District be (increased to seven
20
members/decreased to five members/decreased to
21
three members)?
22
□ YES □ NO

CCS HCS SS SB 975 6
23
[2.] 3. If a majority of the voters voting on a
24
propositi on t o increase the number of board members [to
25
seven] vote in favor of the proposition, then at the next
26
election of board members after the voters vote to increase
27
the number of directors, the voters shall select [one person
28
to serve in addition to the existing six directors as the
29
member who shall run district wide] additional persons to
30
fill any such vacancies.
31
[3.] 4. If a majority of the voters voting on a
32
propositi on t o decrease the number of board members vote in
33
favor of the proposition, then the county clerk shall redraw
34
the district into the resulting number of subdistricts with
35
equal population bases and hold elections by subdistricts
36
pursuant to section 190.050. Thereafter, members of the
37
board shall be elected to se r ve terms of three years and
38
until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
39
[4. Members of the board of directors in office on the
40
date of a n election pursuant to this section to increase or
41
decrease the number of members of the board of directors
42
shall serve the term to which they were elected or appointed
43
and until their successors are elected and qualified.]
1
190.052. Any member of the board of directors who
2
moves residen c y from the district [from which the member was
3
elected] shall be disqualified as a member of the board. If
4
one or two vacancies occur in the membership of the boar d as
5
a result of death, resignation, or disqualification, the
6
remaining members shall appoint one or two qualified
7
persons, as provided in section 190.050, to fill the
8
vacancies until the end of the unexpired term. Such
9
appointment shall be made with the consent of a majority of
10
the remaining members of the board. If the board is unable
11
to agree in filling a vacancy [withi n sixty days or if there

CCS HCS SS SB 975 7
12
are more than two vacancies at any one time], the county
13
commission, upon [notice from the board of failure to agree
14
in filling the vacancies] the written request of a majority
15
of the remaining board members or the ambulance service
16
administrator, as described in section 190.112, shall within
17
[ten] thirty calendar days fill them by appointment of
18
qualified persons, as provided in section 190.050, and shall
19
notify the persons in writing of their appointment. The
20
persons appointed shall serve for the unexpired ter m .
1
190.070. 1. A petition for annexation of land to an
2
ambulance dist ric t shall be signed by not less than ten
3
percent or fifty voters, whichever is fewer, residing within
4
the territory therein described proposed for annexation and
5
shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which
6
the district or the greater portion thereof is situated, and
7
shall be addressed to the commissioners of the county
8
commission. A hearing shall be held thereon [as nearly as
9
possible as in the case of a formation petition] within
10
thirty days of the filing of such petition. If upon the
11
hearing the commissioners of the county com m ission find that
12
the petition is in compliance with the provisions of
13
sections 190.005 to 190.085, they shall order the question
14
to be submitted to the voters within the territory and
15
within the district.
16
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially
17
the fol l owing form to all of the voters in the existing
18
ambulance district and the area proposed to be annexed:
19
Shall ______ (description of territory) be
20
annexed to the ______ ambulance district, and a
21
tax imposed within such annexed area equal to
22
the existing rate of the _____ ambulance
23
district?

CCS HCS SS SB 975 8
24
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question [in
25
the dis t rict and in the territory described in the petition,
26
respectively,] are in favor of the annexation, the
27
commissioners of the county commission shall, within thirty
28
days of the certification of the election results, by order
29
declare the territory annexed and shall describe the altered
30
boundaries of the district. A copy of the same shall be
31
filed with the county clerk .
1
190.089. Upon voter approval of an ambulance district
2
consolidation at an election, the department shall
3
prioritize and expedite any activities necessary to
4
facilitate the consolidation.
1
190.090. 1. Two or more organized ambulance districts
2
may consolida t e i n to one ambulance district by following the
3
procedures set forth in this section.
4
2. If the consolidation of existing ambulance
5
distric t s is desired, a number of voters residing in an
6
existing ambulance district equal to ten percent of the vote
7
cast for governor in the existing district in the next
8
preceding gubernatorial election may file with the county
9
clerk in which the territory or greater part of the proposed
10
consolidated district is situated a petition requesting the
11
consolidation of two or more existing ambulance districts.
12
3. The petition shall be in the following form:
13
We, the undersigned voters of the ______
14
ambulance district do hereby petition that
15
______ existing ambulance districts be
16
consolidated into one consolidated ambulance
17
district to be known as the _____ Ambulance
18
District, subject to the attached consolidation
19
plan.

CCS HCS SS SB 975 9
20
4. An alternative procedure of consolidation may be
21
followe d , if the board of directors of the existing
22
ambulance districts pass a resolution in the following form:
23
Be it resolved by the board of directors of the
24
ambulance district that the ______ ambulance
25
districts be consolidated into one consolidated
26
ambulance district to be known as the _____
27
Ambulance District, subject to the attached
28
consolidation plan.
29
5. Every petition or resolution shall be accompanied
30
by a co n solidation plan outlining the process for the
31
proposed consolidation. At a minimum, the consolidation
32
plan shall include the f ollowing:
33
(1) The name of the proposed consolidated district, a
34
legal de s cription of the boundaries of such consolidated
35
district, and the proposed tax levy to be imposed by the
36
consolidated district. In the event that the proposed plan
37
is for the consolidatio n into an existing district, the
38
consolidation plan shall clearly state that the existing
39
district shall continue as the legal entity into which the
40
other districts are consolidated;
41
(2) The names of the districts to be consolidated,
42
accompan i ed by a list of all real property owned and
43
financial assets currently held by the district, all
44
outstanding bonds or debts of each of such districts, and
45
the current tax levies imposed by each of such districts;
46
(3) The name of the district that shall be responsible
47
for main t aining ambulance service during the consolidation,
48
including continuing operations, administration, and
49
governance of the consolidated district, provided that there
50
shall be a presumption that the district with the largest

CCS HCS SS SB 975 10
51
operating budget in the preceding fiscal year shall assume
52
such responsibility;
53
(4) The proposed number of board members and specific
54
individu a ls who will serve as the initial directors,
55
provided that such directors shall be chosen from among the
56
existing board members of the districts to be consolidated
57
such that there is at least one director from each of the
58
districts to be consolidated; and
59
(5) A proposed timeline for consolidation, which shall
60
not exce e d one hundred eighty days, provided that such
61
timeline shall be subject to modification by the board of
62
the consolidated district for good cause.
63
6. Upon the filing of a petition, or a resolution, and
64
a conso l idation plan with the county clerk from each of the
65
ambulance districts proposed to be consolidated, the county
66
clerk shall present the petition or resolution and a
67
consolidation plan to the commissioners of the county
68
commission [having jurisdiction who shall thereupon order
69
the submission of the question to the voters of the
70
districts. The filing of each of the petitions in the
71
ambulance d istricts shall have occurred within a continuous
72
twelve-month period.
73
6. The notice shall set forth the names of the
74
existin g ambulance districts to be included in the
75
consolidated district.
76
7. The question shall be submitted in substantially
77
the fol l owing form:
78
Shall the existing ______ ambulance districts be
79
consolidated into one ambulance district?
80
8. If the county commission having jurisdiction finds
81
that th e question to consolidate the districts received a

CCS HCS SS SB 975 11
82
majority of the votes cast, the commission shall make and
83
enter its order declaring that the proposition passed.
84
9. Within thirty days after the district has been
85
declare d consolidated, the county commission shall divide
86
the district into six election districts and shall order an
87
election to be held and conducted as provided in section
88
190.050 for the election of directors.
89
10. Within thirty days after the election of the
90
initial b oard of directors of the district, the directors
91
shall meet and the time and place of the first meeting of
92
the board shall be designated by the county commission. At
93
the first meeting the newly elected board of directors s hall
94
choose a name for the consolidated district and shall notify
95
the clerk of the county commission of each county within
96
which the consolidated district is located of the name of
97
the consolidated district.
98
11. On the thirtieth day following the election of
99
the boar d of directors, the existing ambulance districts
100
shall cease to exist and the consolidated district shall
101
assume all of the powers and duties exercised by those
102
districts. All assets and obligations of the existing
103
ambulance d istricts shall become assets and obligations of
104
the consolidated district], who shall record such documents
105
in the records of the county. A petition or resolution for
106
a proposed consolidation shal l be received from all
107
ambulance districts within the same calendar year or shall
108
be considered null and void.
109
7. Each of the ambulance districts seeking to
110
consoli d ate shall post the notice of the intent to
111
consolidate in the same manner as district public meetings
112
are posted. In addition, publication of such notice of
113
intent shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation

CCS HCS SS SB 975 12
114
in every county in which the proposed consolidated ambulance
115
district shall be located, with publication to be made once
116
per week for two consecutive weeks. A public hearing shall
117
be held jointly by all ambulance di s tricts seeking to
118
consolidate at a location within the boundaries of the
119
proposed consolidated ambulance district, provided that such
120
hearing shall be no more than thirty days after the date of
121
the second publication. The notice of intent shall be in
122
substantially the follow ing form:
123
NOTICE OF THE FILING OF A PETITION/RESOLUTION
124
FOR CONSOLIDATION OF THE ______ AMBULANCE
125
DISTRICTS
126
To all voters, residents, and interested
127
persons within the boundaries of the above
128
described ambulance districts: You are hereby
129
notified that a petition/resolution has been
130
filed for the consolidation of the above named
131
ambulance districts into one consolidated
132
ambulance district to be known as the _____
133
Ambulance District. A proposed consolidation
134
plan is available for inspection at the office
135
of the County Clerk of _____ County.
136
A public hearing will be held on ______ (date)
137
at ________ (time) at the following location:
138
________. The purpose of this public hearing
139
shall be to explain the reasons for the
140
consolidation and answer questions from the
141
public.
142
Objections to this consolidation may be filed
143
with the County Clerk of _____ County,
144
provided such objections are filed in writing
145
not less than thirty days after the public
146
hearing. Any such objection must be signed by
147
a number of voters residing in the proposed
148
consolidated district that is not less than

CCS HCS SS SB 975 13
149
five percent of the votes cast for governor in
150
the district in the most recent gubernatorial
151
election.
152
8. If no objections are filed with the county clerk
153
within t hirty days after the public hearing, within forty-
154
five days following the date of the public hearing, the
155
county commission shall order the districts consolidated
156
pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan and shall
157
further appoint as directors those individuals identified in
158
the consolidation plan. The county commission shall further
159
set a date, time, and lo cation for the first meeting of the
160
directors of the newly consolidated district.
161
9. Upon receipt of any objections filed, the county
162
clerk s h all verify that such objections are signed by the
163
necessary number of voters of the district. If such
164
objections are signed by an appropriate num b er of voters,
165
the county commission of each county in which the proposed
166
consolidated district is to be located shall thereupon order
167
the submission of the question to the voters of the
168
districts. The question shall be submitted in substantially
169
the followi ng form:
170
Shall the existing ______ ambulance districts
171
be consolidated into one ambulance district to
172
be known as the _________ Ambulance District,
173
with such consolidated district authorized to
174
levy a property tax not to exceed the annual
175
rate of ______ cents on the hundred dollars
176
assessed valuation or a sales tax in an amount
177
not to exceed ______ percent, or a combination
178
of both?

CCS HCS SS SB 975 14
179
If the county commission having jurisdiction finds that the
180
question to consolidate the districts received a majority of
181
the votes cast, the commission shall make and enter its
182
order declaring that the proposition passed. The county
183
commission shall further order the districts consolidated
184
pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan and shall
185
further appoint as directors those individuals identified in
186
the consolidation plan. The county commission shall further
187
set a date, time, and lo cation for the first meeting of the
188
directors of the newly consolidated district.
189
10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
190
contrary , the consolidated district may impose an initial
191
tax levy up to the highest tax levy of the consolidating
192
districts, provided such tax levy is specifically set forth
193
in the ballot language submitted to and approved by the
194
voters of the consolidating district.
195
11. Without a vote of the residents of the
196
consolid a ted district as provided in this section, no
197
consolidated ambulance district shall be permitted to impose
198
a property tax greater than the lowest of any existing
199
property tax rate of the districts to be consolidated, nor
200
shall the consolidated ambulance district be permitted to
201
impose any sales tax greater than the lowest of any existing
202
sales tax rate of the districts to be consolidated.
203
12. Upon written certification by the board of
204
director s of the consolidated district to the prior district
205
that the consolidated district has obtained the necessary
206
licenses and permits to operate an ambulance service and all
207
directors of such consolidated district have completed the
208
training required by section 190.053, the existing ambulance
209
districts shall cease to exist and the consolidated district

CCS HCS SS SB 975 15
210
shall assume all of the powers and duties exercised by those
211
districts. All assets and obligations of the existing
212
ambulance d istricts shall become assets and obligations of
213
the consolidated district.
1
590.192. 1. There is hereby established the "Critical
2
Incident Stre s s M a nagement Program" within the department of
3
public safety. The program shall provide services for peace
4
officers and f i rst responders to assist in coping with
5
stress and potential psychological trauma resulting from a
6
response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult
7
event. Such services may include consultation, risk
8
assess m ent, education, intervention, and other crisis
9
intervention services provided by the department to peace
10
officers and first responders affected by a critical
11
incident. For purposes of this section, a "critical
12
incident" shall mean any event outside the usual realm of
13
human experience that is markedly distressing or evokes
14
reactions of intense fear, helplessness, or horror and
15
involves the perceived threat to a person's physical
16
integrity or the physical integrity of someone else. For
17
purposes of this section, the term "first responder" shall
18
have the same meaning as first responder in section 190.1010.
19
2. All peace officers and first responders shall be
20
require d to meet with a program service provider once every
21
three to five years for a mental health check-in, or
22
participate in a department-established behavioral health or
23
mental health program that meets the requirements of
24
subsection 1 of this section which shall satisfy this
25
requirement. The program service provider shall send a
26
notification to the peace officer's commanding officer, or
27
first responder's commanding officer, or first responder's

CCS HCS SS SB 975 16
28
director or supervisor that he or she completed such check-
29
in.
30
3. Any information disclosed by a peace officer or
31
first r e sponder shall be privileged and shall not be used as
32
evidence in criminal, administrative, or civil proceedings
33
against the peace officer or first responder unless:
34
(1) A program representative reasonably believes the
35
disclosu r e is necessary to prevent harm to a person who
36
received services or to prevent harm to another person;
37
(2) The person who received the services provides
38
written c onsent to the disclosure; or
39
(3) The person receiving services discloses
40
informat i on that is required to be reported under mandatory
41
reporting laws.
42
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
43
the "98 8 Pub l ic Safety Fund", which shall consist of moneys
44
appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer
45
shall be custodian of the fund. In ac c ordance with sections
46
30.170 and 30.180, the state tr e asurer may approve
47
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and
48
moneys in the f und shall be used solely by the department of
49
public safety for the purposes of providing services for
50
peace officers and first responders to assist in coping with
51
stress and potential psychological trauma resulting from a
52
response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult
53
event pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. Such
54
services may include consultation, risk assessme nt,
55
education, intervention, and other crisis intervention
56
services provided by the department to peace officers or
57
first responders affected by a critical incident. The
58
director of public safety may prescribe rules and
59
regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this

CCS HCS SS SB 975 17
60
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
61
defined i n section 536.010, that is created under the
62
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
63
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
64
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
65
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
66
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
67
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
68
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
69
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
70
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
71
2021, shall be invalid and void.
72
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
73
to the c o ntrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
74
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
75
general revenue fund.
76
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
77
fund in t he same manner as other funds are invested. Any
78
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
79
credited to the fund.
